Montana, session 2025, HB134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 87-5-605, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-5-605. Powers and duties of department -- rules. (1) The department shall:
(a) create, maintain, and promote a statewide fish, wildlife, and parks crimestoppers program in
order to assist law enforcement agencies in detecting and combating fish, wildlife, and parks-related crimes;
and
(b) consider the board's recommendations and take action on them.
(2) The department may:
(a) advise and assist in the creation and maintenance of local programs, including neighborhood
watch programs;
(b) encourage the channeling of information from state and local programs to law enforcement
agencies;
(c) foster the detection of fish, wildlife, and parks-related crimes by the public;
(d) encourage the public, through a reward program or otherwise, to provide information that
assists in the prosecution of fish, wildlife, and parks-related crimes;
(e) offer financial rewards, reward permits, or other incentives to the public;
(e)(f) promote state and local programs through the media;
(f)(g) accept gifts, grants, or donations for the furtherance of the program and spend these in
compliance with the conditions of the gifts, grants, or donations; and
(g)(h) adopt rules necessary to administer the provisions of this part."
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 134

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 134.1
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 134